Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 2

Tennessee Ethics Commission Act of 2006 — Violations

3-6-201. Complaints by private citizens or the commission.

Any citizen of Tennessee may file a sworn complaint executed on a form prescribed by the Tennessee ethics commission alleging a violation of laws or rules within the jurisdiction of the commission.

No political party chairman, state or county executive director of a political party, or employee or agent of a political party acting in that person's official capacity may file a complaint with the commission for a violation of laws or rules within the jurisdiction of the commission. Nothing in this section prohibits a private citizen, acting in a private capacity, from filing a sworn complaint with the commission under this section.

A complaint filed under this section shall set forth in simple, concise, and direct statements:

The name of the complainant;

The street or mailing address of the complainant;

The name of each alleged violator;

The position or title of each alleged violator;

A short and plain statement of the nature of the violation and the law or rule upon which the commission's jurisdiction over the violation depends;

A statement of the facts constituting the alleged violation and the dates on which, or period of time in which, the alleged violation occurred; and

All documents or other material available to the complainant that are relevant to the allegation; a list of all documents or other material within the knowledge of the complainant and available to the complainant that are relevant to the allegation, but that are not in the possession of the complainant, including the location of the documents, if known; and a list of all documents or other material within the knowledge of the complainant that are unavailable to the complainant and that are relevant to the complaint, including the location of the documents, if known.

The complaint shall be accompanied by an affidavit stating that the information contained in the complaint is either correct or that the complainant has good reason to believe and does believe that the violation occurred. If the complaint is based on information and belief, the complaint shall state the source and basis of the information and belief. The complainant may swear to the facts by oath before a notary public.

The commission may initiate a complaint upon an affirmative vote that includes three (3) members of the commission who are members of the same party or two (2) members of the commission who are members of different parties.

Any complaint that is filed against a candidate in any election, as defined in § 2-10-102, during the period from thirty (30) days immediately prior to the election through election day shall be considered filed but not verified by the commission. The commission shall take no action relative to the complaint during this thirty-day period. In addition, the commission shall not initiate a complaint during the thirty-day period.

During the thirty-day period, the commission shall stay any proceedings with regard to an ethics complaint filed against a candidate more than thirty (30) days prior to voting for the election; provided, that the candidate may waive the postponement in writing.

For purposes of this subsection (e), any provisions of this chapter setting time periods for initiating a complaint or for performing any other action are considered tolled until after the election at which the candidate stands for elective office.

Within five (5) days after the filing or initiation of a complaint, the commission shall cause a copy of the complaint to be transmitted by return receipt requested mail to the person alleged to have committed the violation.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-202. Confidentiality — Public disclosure.

The members and staff of the Tennessee ethics commission shall preserve the confidentiality of all commission proceedings, including records relating to a preliminary investigation. Such records shall be exempt from the provisions of title 10, chapter 7 and shall be confidential until:

The alleged violator requests in writing that the investigation and associated records and meetings be made public;

The commission finds that probable cause exists to believe that a violation has occurred. Upon this determination, the records and proceedings shall be made public on:

The date the public hearing to determine whether a violation has occurred commences; or

The date the commission refers a matter based upon a finding of probable cause; or

The commission determines that no probable cause exists to believe that a violation has occurred. Upon such determination, the records and proceedings shall be made public sixty (60) days after:

The date the report of the commission's finding is issued, if the complainant does not request a probable cause hearing pursuant to § 3-6-203(b)(1); or

The date the commission issues its finding of no probable cause from a probable cause hearing.

No personal or professional financial records of the alleged violator shall be disclosed pursuant to this section upon a finding of no probable cause.

A member of the commission or a member of the commission staff may acknowledge receipt of a complaint or may disclose information to the extent necessary to successfully pursue an investigation. In no event shall such information against a candidate in any election, as defined in § 2-10-102, be disclosed during the period from thirty (30) days immediately preceding the commencement of voting for that election through election day, unless the candidate requests in writing the disclosure of the information.

A member of the commission or member of the commission staff who knowingly discloses information in violation of this section commits a Class C misdemeanor. A violation of this section also subjects the person to the civil penalties imposed by § 3-6-205(a)(2). Violation of this section by a member of the commission shall be grounds for removal from office.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27; 2008, ch. 697, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

3-6-203. Preliminary investigation — Referral of sufficient complaint to attorney general — Presentation of evidence on probable cause — Determination of probable cause — Public hearing.

The commission shall initiate a preliminary investigation of each sworn complaint that complies with § 3-6-201. If the commission determines that the sworn complaint does not comply with § 3-6-201, then the commission shall dismiss the complaint and notify the complainant. In the notification sent to the complainant, the commission shall state with particularity why the complaint does not comply with § 3-6-201. If the commission has referred the complaint to the registry of election finance, then the commission shall also notify the complainant of the referral.

The commission shall refer a factually and legally sufficient complaint to the office of the attorney general and reporter, who shall conduct a preliminary investigation. The commission shall make a probable cause determination after the office of the attorney general and reporter completes its investigation and reports its findings to the commission. Both the alleged violator and the complainant shall be entitled, upon request, to present evidence before the commission prior to the commission's probable cause determination. The commission shall have notice that evidence will be presented to the commission personally served upon, or sent by return receipt requested mail, to the alleged violator and the complainant. The commission has discretion to determine the appropriate procedure for the presenting of evidence.

If the commission determines that no probable cause exists to believe a violation of any law or rule administered and enforced by the commission occurred, the commission shall dismiss the complaint by issuing a report to the complainant and the alleged violator, stating with particularity its reasons for dismissal of the complaint. A complainant may request a hearing upon a determination of no probable cause. If after the hearing the commission determines that there is no probable cause, the commission may order the complainant to reimburse the alleged violator for any reasonable costs and reasonable attorney fees the alleged violator has incurred.

If the commission determines that probable cause exists to believe a violation of any law or rule administered and enforced by the commission occurred, the commission shall conduct a public hearing and, if the alleged violator is a member of the general assembly, shall notify the ethics committee of the appropriate house of the probable cause determination. Both the alleged violator and the complainant shall receive, by personal service or return receipt requested mail, notice of the time, date, and location of the hearing.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-204. Subpoena power — Fees — Judicial review — Procedure.

The Tennessee ethics commission, on its own motion or at the request of the alleged violator, may issue subpoenas in accordance with the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure, except that service may be by certified mail, in addition to the means of service provided by the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure. Witnesses under subpoena shall be entitled to the same fees as are now or may hereafter be provided by law or by action of the commission. The party requesting the subpoenas shall bear the cost of paying the fees to the witnesses subpoenaed.

A person who is aggrieved by a final disposition of the commission shall be entitled to judicial review.

Proceedings for review shall be instituted by filing a petition for review in the chancery court of Davidson County, unless another court is specified by statute. The petition shall be filed within sixty (60) days after the entry of the commission's final disposition on the complaint. Copies of the petition shall be served upon the commission, the complainant and all parties of record, including the attorney general and reporter, in accordance with the provisions of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure pertaining to service of process.

The provision of § 4-5-322 relating to judicial review of agency decisions shall apply to a petition of review filed pursuant to this section.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-205. Penalties.

The Tennessee ethics commission may impose a civil penalty for a violation of title 8, chapter 50, part 5.

“Class 1 offense” means the late filing of any report or statement required by title 8, chapter 50, part 5. A Class 1 offense shall be punishable by a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day, up to a maximum of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).

The Tennessee ethics commission shall have personally served upon, or sent by return receipt requested mail, an assessment letter to any person required to file, upon the commission's discovery that a due report has not been filed. A civil penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day shall begin to accrue five (5) days after personal service or receipt of the letter and shall continue to accrue until the report is filed, or for thirty (30) days, whichever occurs first.

To request a waiver, reduction, or to in any way contest a penalty imposed by the Tennessee ethics commission for a Class 1 offense, a person shall file a petition with the commission.

“Class 2 offense” means failing to file a report required by title 8, chapter 50, part 5, within thirty-five (35) days after service of process or receipt of notice by registered or certified mail of an assessment or any other violation of the requirements of title 8, chapter 50, part 5, except where another penalty is prescribed by law. A Class 2 offense is punishable by a maximum civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

For any Class 2 offense, the Tennessee ethics commission shall send an assessment letter to a person required to file, in a form sufficient to advise the person required to file, of the factual basis of the violation, the maximum penalty and the date a response to the letter must be filed. If a disclosure report is returned to a person required to file for correction, a copy of the original shall be retained on file until the corrected report is returned to the Tennessee ethics commission. If the original filing was in compliance with the intent of the law and minor errors are corrected within the date set for a response, no penalty shall be assessed.

To request a waiver, reduction, or to in any way contest a penalty imposed by the Tennessee ethics commission for a Class 2 offense, a person shall file a petition with the commission.

Any candidate for state public office who fails to file any statement or report required by title 8, chapter 50, part 5, shall be ineligible to qualify for election to any state public office until the statement or report is filed with the commission.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

3-6-206. Register of unpaid penalties — Effect of unpaid penalties.

The Tennessee ethics commission shall maintain a register of all civil penalties imposed under this chapter and remaining unpaid.

If a civil penalty lawfully assessed and any lawfully assessed cost attendant to the penalty are not paid within thirty (30) days after the assessment becomes final, any candidate owing a civil penalty shall be ineligible to qualify for election to any state public office until the penalty and costs are paid.

If a civil penalty authorized by this section is imposed, it shall be considered a personal judgment against the person subject to the civil penalty.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-207. Misuse of office for personal gain by general assembly member.

Notwithstanding §3-6-203, if the commission determines that probable cause exists to believe that a member of the general assembly has committed an act constituting misuse of office for personal financial gain, then, except as otherwise provided in §3-6-306(a)(3), no civil penalty shall be imposed and the commission shall instead report its determination and findings to the ethics committee of the appropriate house of the general assembly.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-208. Sanctions for unsubstantiated complaints — Immunity.

If the commission determines that a person:

Filed a complaint or provided information that resulted in an investigation knowing that the material statements in the complaint or the information provided was not true;

Filed an unsubstantiated complaint in reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the statements contained in the complaint; or

Filed one (1) or more unsubstantiated complaints that constituted abuse of process,

then the complainant is subject to the civil penalties authorized by §3-6-205(a)(2) and may be liable for any reasonable costs and reasonable attorney fees the alleged violator has incurred. The commission may also decline to consider any further complaints brought by the complainant.

The sanctions authorized by subsection (a) are not exclusive and do not preclude any other remedies or rights of action the alleged violator may have against the complainant or informant under the law; provided, that any person who in good faith files a verified complaint or any person, official, or agency that gives credible information that results in a formal complaint filed by the commission is immune from any civil liability that otherwise might result by reason of such actions.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-209. Complaints against commission — Special joint committee — Probable cause — Recommendation on penalty — Sanctions for unsubstantiated complaints — Immunity.

An individual who is within the jurisdiction of the commission may file a sworn complaint against any member or employee of the commission alleging a violation of this chapter, including allegations of arbitrary and capricious actions of the commission against the individual. The complaint shall state with specificity such allegation. Such complaint shall be filed with the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. Each speaker shall, after determining that there are sufficient grounds for review, appoint four (4) members of their respective bodies to a special joint committee, which shall investigate the complaint. Two (2) members of the majority party and two (2) members of the minority party shall be appointed to the committee by each speaker. The special joint committee shall appoint a chair and other officers deemed necessary. An affirmative vote of five (5) members of the committee shall be required for any committee action.

If the special joint committee finds insufficient evidence to establish probable cause to believe a violation has occurred, it shall dismiss the complaint.

If, upon completion of its preliminary investigation, the committee finds sufficient evidence to establish probable cause to believe a violation has occurred, the chair of the committee shall transmit the findings to the governor, who shall convene a meeting of the governor, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives to take such final action on the complaint as they shall deem appropriate consistent with penalties imposed pursuant to this chapter, including referring the matter to the office of the attorney general and reporter or removing the member of the commission from office and declaring the office vacant.

Upon request of a majority of the governor, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, the special joint committee shall submit a recommendation as to what penalty, if any, should be imposed.

If a person:

Files a complaint against a member of the commission pursuant to this section that results in an investigation, knowing that the material statements in the complaint or the information provided was not true;

Files an unsubstantiated complaint in reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the statements contained in the complaint; or

Files one (1) or more unsubstantiated complaints that constitute abuse of process,then the complainant is subject to the civil penalties authorized by § 3-6-205(a)(2) and may be liable for any reasonable costs and reasonable attorney fees the alleged violator has incurred. The sanctions authorized by this subsection (e) are not exclusive and do not preclude any other remedies or rights of action the member may have against the complainant or informant under the law; provided, that any person who in good faith files a verified complaint or any person, official, or agency who gives credible information that results in an investigation is immune from any civil liability that otherwise might result by reason of such actions.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that the act is and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

3-6-210. Applicability of §§ 3-6-201 — 3-6-203 — Authority of commission to investigate alleged violations of title 8, chapter 50, part 5 — Petitions considered as contested case.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(1), §§ 3-6-201 — 3-6-203 shall only apply to a complaint alleging a violation of this chapter.

The commission has the authority to investigate any alleged violation of title 8, chapter 50, part 5, upon a sworn complaint by a citizen of this state that meets the requirements of § 3-6-201(b) or upon its own motion. The commission shall only have the power to assess a civil penalty after notice and opportunity for hearing.

A petition filed pursuant to § 3-6-205(a)(1)(B) or (a)(2)(B) may be considered as a contested case under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2009, ch. 556, § 20.

Cross-References. Bureau of ethics and campaign finance, title 4, ch. 55.